Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
Acts 2005, No. 71, § 5: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the applicability of the Internal Revenue Code is unclear in current Arkansas Teacher Retirement Systems laws; that this act is necessary to clarify the issue and ensure consistent and correct application of Arkansas Teacher Retirement System provisions; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 385, § 10: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System law must be changed and refined periodically to clarify existing administrative practices within the system; that clarifying incorrect references and language in current law consumes a considerable amount of administrative time and effort; that the law needs to be clarified to reduce the cost and effort of responding to those inconsistencies; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 494, § 5: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System is expending valuable time and resources in determining and locating the recipients of benefits upon a member's death in certain circumstances; that the effective operation and administration of the system in these instances would be advanced by paying the benefits to the member's estate; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 911, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the earnings limitation as currently provided to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System threatens the financial stability of the system; that the current earnings limitation jeopardizes the system's ability to meet the current and long-term needs of its members; and that the most effective time to make changes to the system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 97, § 19: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System require technical revisions; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, No. 296, § 2: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System regarding lump sum benefit payments require revision; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, No. 297, § 2: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System regarding monthly stipends require revision; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, No. 487, § 2: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System regarding disability retirement require revision; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 425, § 2: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 468, § 28:
July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in dire need of technical correction to bring them into conformance with the current public pension policy; that such technical correction is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 743, § 8: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 1202, § 2: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 1322, § 2: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 1323, § 2: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, No. 1324, § 2: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 45, § 22: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System assets and accounting are complex, and the system must be able to appropriately manage the system members accounts and benefits; that many of these technical corrections are currently the policy of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and should be codified to reflect that policy; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 136, § 2: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are urgently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year so most changes to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System plan work best if the changes are made at the beginning of a fiscal year; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, No. 137, § 5: Feb. 24, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the policy of the system historically has been to calculate deposits and benefits for an additional fiscal year following the last fiscal year that the member renders actual service to a covered employer; that the system's policy needs to be codified into Arkansas law; that the operational definition should be codified as soon as possible to prevent confusion; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 163, § 3: Mar. 4, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are in urgent need of revision and updating to bring them into compliance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System should not provide service credit for contract buyouts when services are not provided on-site to the employer to prevent undue costs from being passed on to the system by contract buyout participants obtaining vesting and service credit rights that otherwise would not be earned or payable; and that this act is immediately necessary because allowing inactive contract buyouts for service credit is poor public policy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 224 § 2: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year, so most changes to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System plan work best if the changes are made at the beginning of a fiscal year; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, No. 557 § 2: Mar. 22, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the current listing of those eligible to be designated as a beneficiary under Option A and Option B is unclear and difficult to administer; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 973, § 2: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year so most changes to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System plan work best if the changes are made at the beginning of a fiscal year; and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, No. 976, § 2: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year, so most changes to the plan work best if the changes are made at the beginning of a fiscal year; and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, No. 977, § 2: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2013, No. 493, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act addressing the administration of disability retirement are in need of revision to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy and proper administration; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; and that this act is necessary to allow the provisions impacting disability retirement to begin on the first day of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2013, No. 521, § 4: Mar. 28, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must administer member's accounts in certain situations involving a claim or dispute to which the system is not a party but for which clear rules are necessary; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 571, § 4: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision and updating to maintain the act in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; and that these provisions are necessary to provide proper administration to benefits to begin on the first day of the fiscal year; that such revisions and updating are of great importance for actuarial purposes and to protect the benefits for members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2013, No. 603, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; that having a July 1, 2013, effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide proper administration of the system; and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2013, No. 720, § 3: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; that having a July 1, 2013, effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to being on the first day of the fiscal year and provide proper administration of the system; and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2013, No. 966, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act need revision to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the multiplier rates for the life annuity may need to be adjusted to keep the system actuarially sound; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; and that this act is necessary to ensure that provisions of this act become effective on the first day of the fiscal year and to maintain an orderly system of benefits for members. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2013, No. 967, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial appropriateness of the system's plan; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; that having a July 1, 2013 effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide proper administration of the system; and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2015, No. 87, § 2: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, a state agency created by the General Assembly for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that having an effective date of July 1, 2015, is necessary to allow the provisions within this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year to provide proper administration of the procedures herein; that such revisions and updating are of great importance for actuarial purposes and to protect the benefits to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2015, No. 219, § 2: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revising and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, a state agency created by the General Assembly for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that having a July 1, 2015, effective date is necessary to allow the provisions within this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year to provide proper administration of the procedures herein; that such revisions and updating are of great importance for actuarial purposes and to
protect the benefits to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2015, No. 225, § 2: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, a state agency created by the General Assembly for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that having a July 1, 2015, effective date is necessary to allow the provisions within this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year to provide proper administration of the procedures herein; that such revisions and updating are of great importance for actuarial purposes and to
protect the benefits to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on or before July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2015, No. 301, § 11: Mar. 4, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex and the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of clarification to operate the system efficiently and effectively; that such clarification is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 375, § 3: Mar. 11, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex and the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to operate the system efficiently and effectively; that such revision and updating are of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 199, § 2: Feb. 17, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the operations of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are complex; that the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 243, § 5: Feb. 21, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 293, § 9: Feb. 28, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are complex; that the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”
